Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1352
Construction contracts; bidders; statement of qualifications.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person proposing to bid on a contract for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of roads, bridges, and their appurtenances to be let by the department shall submit to the department, at such times as it may require, a statement showing such person's qualifications. Such statement shall be under oath and on a standard form to be prepared and supplied by the department. The statement shall be confidential and only for the use of the department.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any contract granted an exemption from prequalification requirements pursuant to subsection (2) of section 39-1351.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 52, p. 440;

Laws 1961, c. 198, § 1, p. 601;

Laws 2015, LB312, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB117, § 2.